Washington statutes.
RCW 11.62.005

Definitions.

As used in this chapter, the following terms shall have the meanings indicated.

(1) "Personal property" shall include any tangible personal property, any instrument evidencing a debt, obligation, stock, chose in action, license or ownership, any debt or any other intangible property.

(2)(a) "Successor" and "successors" shall mean (subject to subsection (2)(b) of this section):

(i) That person or those persons who are entitled to the claimed property pursuant to the terms and provisions of the last will and testament of the decedent or by virtue of the laws of intestate succession contained in this title; and/or

(ii) The surviving spouse or surviving domestic partner of the decedent to the extent that the surviving spouse or surviving domestic partner is entitled to the property claimed as his or her undivided one-half interest in the community property of said spouse or said domestic partner and the decedent; and/or

(iii) The department of social and health services, to the extent of funds expended or paid, in the case of claims provided under RCW 43.20B.080; and/or

(iv) This state, in the case of escheat property.

(b) Any person claiming to be a successor solely by reason of being a creditor of the decedent or of the decedent's estate, except for the state as set forth in (a)(iii) and (iv) of this subsection, shall be excluded from the definition of "successor".

(3) "Person" shall mean any individual or organization, specifically including but not limited to a bank, credit union, brokerage firm or stock transfer agent, corporation, government or governmental subdivision or agency, business trust, estate, trust, partnership or association, two or more persons having a joint or common interest, or any other legal or commercial entity.

[ 2008 c 6 s 922; 2006 c 360 s 15; 1994 c 21 s 1; 1988 c 64 s 24; 1977 ex.s. c 234 s 29.]

NOTES:

Part headings not law—Severability—2008 c 6: See RCW 26.60.900 and 26.60.901.

Clarification of laws—Enforceability of act—Severability—2006 c 360: See notes following RCW 11.108.070.

Conflict with federal requirements—Effective date—1994 c 21: See notes following RCW 43.20B.080.

Application, effective date—Severability—1977 ex.s. c 234: See notes following RCW 11.20.020.

Legislative confirmation of effect of 1994 c 21: RCW 43.20B.090.